District of Columbia statutes.
49-210

Liability of officer or his estate until accounts are found correct.

Until an officer or his legal representative shall have received notice that the property accounts of such officer have been examined and found correct the liability of such officer or of his estate for public property for which he is or may have been responsible or accountable shall be in no way affected by resignation, discharge, change in official position, desertion, or death.

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 777, ch. 328
as added Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 633, ch. 146, § 38

History

1981 Ed., § 39-210.
1973 Ed., § 39-510.

Prior Codifications